Massachusetts, session 194th, S2168.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all design, engineering and
inspection services shall be subject to the provisions of M.G.L., Chapter 7, Section 52-55.
of 1